Utah statutes.
31A-22-903.   Fraud in obtaining membership.
Subject to Sections 31A-22-403 and 31A-22-405, any certificate of membership
secured by misrepresentation with reference to any application for membership,
document, or other proof, for the purpose of obtaining membership in, or an
insurance benefit from, the fraternal is void, if the fraternal relied on it
and it is either material or fraudulent.
